en: Seed bars
fr: Barres de graines

en: Sesame seed bars
fr: Barres de sésame

en: Nut bars, Mixed nut bars
de: Nussriegel
es: Barritas de frutos de cáscara, Barritas de frutos secos
fi: pähkinäpatukat
fr: Barres de fruits à coques, Barres de fruits secs
he: חטיפי אגוזים
hr: Pločice s orašastim plodovima
it: Barrette alle nocciole
nl: Notenrepen
pt: Barras de frutos secos

en: Cashew nut bars, Cashew bars
de: Cashew-Riegel
es: Barritas de anacardos
fr: Barres de noix de cajou, Barres d'anacardes
hr: Pločice od indijskog oraha
nl: Cashewnotenrepen

en: Peanut bars
de: Erdnussriegel
es: Barritas de cacahuetes, Barritas de maní
fr: Barres de cacahuètes, Barres d'arachides
he: חטיפי בוטנים
hr: Pločice od kikirikija
it: Barrette di arachidi
nl: Pindarepen
pt: Barras de amendoim
zh: 花生棒

en: Frozen bars
de: Eisriegel, Eis-Riegel, Speiseeisriegel
fr: Barres glacées
hr: Smrznute šipke
nl: IJsrepen

en: Ice cream candy chocolate bars, Frozen candy chocolate bars, Chocolate coated ice cream
fr: Barres chocolatées glacées, Barre glacée chocolatée
hr: Smrznute bombone čokoladice
ru: Мороженое в шоколаде

fr: Barres aux fruits, Barre aux fruits
nl: Vruchtenrepen

en: Sweet pastries and pies
nl: Zoet gebak en taarten
zh: 甜糕点及派

en: Viennoiseries, viennoiserie, Puff pastry
ca: Brioixeria
de: Viennoiseries, Blätterteige
es: Viennoiseries
fi: Viinerit
fr: Viennoiseries
hr: Bečke serije
it: Pasta sfoglia
ja: ヴィエノワズリー
nl: Viennoiseries, Bladerdeegsnacks
ru: Изделия из слоёного теста
zh: 维也纳甜酥面包

en: Cinnamon rolls
da: Kanelsnegle
sv: Kanelbullar

en: Breads with raisins, Raisin puff pastry, Viennese pastries, Viennese pastry
da: Brød med rosiner, Rosinbrød
de: Rosinenbrote, Rosinenbrot
fi: rusinaleivät
fr: Pains aux raisins, escargots aux raisins, escargot aux raisins, pain aux raisins
hr: Kruhovi s grožđicama
it: Pane con uvetta, Pane all'uvetta
lt: Duona su razinomis, Razinų sluoksniuota tešla, Vienos pyragaičiai, Vienos tešla
nl: Rozijnenbroden, Rozijnenbrood
ro: Pâini cu stafide, Pâine cu stafide
sv: Bröd med russin, Russinbröd

en: Pains suisses
xx: Pains suisses
fr: Pains suisses

en: Croissants
xx: Croissants
bg: Кроасани
fi: Kroisantit, Croissantit
hr: Kroasani
ja: クロワッサン
tr: Kruvasan, Kruasan, Ay Çöreği, Ayçöreği

en: Bakery Croissants, Croissant from bakery
fr: Croissants artisanal
nl: Bakkercroissants

en: Butter croissants, Butter croissant from bakery
de: Buttercroissants
es: Croissants de mantequilla
fi: Voisarvet, Voikroisantit, Voicroissantit
fr: Croissants au beurre, Croissant au beurre artisanal
hr: Kroasani s maslacem
it: Croissant al burro
nl: Roombotercroissants

fr: Croissants ordinaires
nl: Croissants (ongevuld)

en: Filled croissants
bg: Кроасани с пълнеж
de: Gefüllte Croissants
es: Cruasanes rellenos
fi: Täytetyt voisarvet, Täytetyt kroisantit, Täytetyt croissantit
fr: Croissants fourrés
hr: Punjeni kroasani
it: Cornetti farciti
nl: Croissants (gevuld)

en: Croissant filled with chocolate
bg: Кроасани с шоколадов пълнеж
de: Mit Schokolade gefüllte Croissants
es: Cruasán relleno de chocolate
fi: Suklaalla täytetyt voisarvet, Suklaalla täytetyt kroisantit, Suklaalla täytetyt croissantit
fr: Croissants fourrés au chocolat, Croissant fourré au chocolat
hr: Kroasan punjen čokoladom
it: Cornetti farciti con cioccolato
nl: Chocoladecroissants

en: Croissant filled with cream
de: Mit Sahne gefüllte Croissants
fi: Kermalla täytetyt voisarvet, Kermalla täytetyt kroisantit, Kermalla täytetyt croissantit
fr: Croissants fourrés à la crème, Croissant fourré à la crème
hr: Kroasan punjen kremom
it: Cornetti farciti con crema
nl: Croissant gevuld met room